test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-ngu_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - ӈу: # Noun 'pole / (fin) salko' - partial paradigm /Type 1/ - ŋu
     ӈу+N+Sg+Nom: ӈу
     ӈу+N+Sg+Acc: ӈумʼ
     ӈу+N+Sg+Gen: ӈуʼ
     ӈу+N+Sg+Dat: ӈунʼ
     ӈу+N+Sg+Loc: ӈухуна
     ӈу+N+Sg+Abl: ӈухуд
     ӈу+N+Sg+Pros: ӈувна
     ӈу+N+Du+Nom: ӈухуʼ
     ӈу+N+Du+Acc: ӈухуʼ
     ӈу+N+Du+Gen: ӈухуʼ
     ӈу+N+Pl+Nom: ӈуˮ
     ӈу+N+Pl+Acc: ӈу
     ӈу+N+Pl+Gen: ӈуˮ
     ӈу+N+Pl+Dat: ӈухуˮ
     ӈу+N+Pl+Loc: ӈухуˮна
     ӈу+N+Pl+Abl: ӈухут
     ӈу+N+Pl+Pros: ӈуˮумна
     ӈу+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: ӈув
     ӈу+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: ӈув
     ӈу+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: ӈун
     ӈу+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: ӈухун
     ӈу+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: ӈухунан
     ӈу+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: ӈухудан
     ӈу+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: ӈувнан
     ӈу+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: ӈухуюн
     ӈу+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: ӈухуюн
     ӈу+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: ӈухуюн
     ӈу+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: ӈун
     ӈу+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: ӈун
     ӈу+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: ӈуˮун
     ӈу+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: ӈухуˮн
     ӈу+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: ӈухуˮнан
     ӈу+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: ӈухутан
     ӈу+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: ӈуˮумнан
     ӈу+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: ӈур
     ӈу+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: ӈумд
     ӈу+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: ӈунд
     ӈу+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: ӈухунд
     ӈу+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: ӈухунанд
     ӈу+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: ӈухуданд
     ӈу+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: ӈувнанд
     ӈу+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: ӈухуюд
     ӈу+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: ӈухуюд
     ӈу+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: ӈухуют
     ӈу+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: ӈуд
     ӈу+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: ӈуд
     ӈу+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: ӈут
     ӈу+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: ӈухут
     ӈу+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: ӈухуˮнат
     ӈу+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: ӈухутат
     ӈу+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: ӈуˮумнат
     ӈу+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: ӈуда
     ӈу+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: ӈумда
     ӈу+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: ӈунда
     ӈу+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: ӈухунда
     ӈу+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: ӈухунанда
     ӈу+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: ӈухуданда
     ӈу+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: ӈувнанда
     ӈу+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: ӈухуюда
     ӈу+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: ӈухуюда
     ӈу+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: ӈухуюта
     ӈу+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: ӈуда
     ӈу+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: ӈуда
     ӈу+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: ӈута
     ӈу+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: ӈухута
     ӈу+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: ӈухуˮната
     ӈу+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: ӈухутата
     ӈу+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: ӈуˮумната
     ӈу+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: ӈумиʼ
#     ӈу+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1.2: ӈуми
     ӈу+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: ӈумиʼ
#     ӈу+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1.2: ӈуми
     ӈу+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: ӈуниʼ
#     ӈу+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1.2: ӈуни
     ӈу+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: ӈухуниʼ
#     ӈу+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1.2: ӈухуни
     ӈу+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: ӈухунаниʼ
#     ӈу+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1.2: ӈухунани
     ӈу+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: ӈухуданиʼ
#     ӈу+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1.2: ӈухудани
     ӈу+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: ӈувнаниʼ
#     ӈу+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1.2: ӈувнани
     ӈу+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: ӈухуюниʼ
#     ӈу+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1.2: ӈухуюни
     ӈу+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: ӈухуюниʼ
#     ӈу+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1.2: ӈухуюни
     ӈу+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: ӈухуюниʼ
#     ӈу+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1.2: ӈухуюни
     ӈу+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: ӈуниʼ
#     ӈу+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1.2: ӈуни
     ӈу+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: ӈуниʼ
#     ӈу+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1.2: ӈуни
     ӈу+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: ӈуˮниʼ
#     ӈу+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1.2: ӈуˮни
     ӈу+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: ӈухуˮниʼ
#     ӈу+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1.2: ӈухуˮни
     ӈу+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: ӈухуˮнаниʼ
#     ӈу+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1.2: ӈухуˮнани
     ӈу+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: ӈухутаниʼ
#     ӈу+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1.2: ӈухутани
     ӈу+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: ӈуˮумнаниʼ
#     ӈу+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1.2: ӈуˮумнани
     ӈу+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: ӈуриʼ
     ӈу+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: ӈумдиʼ
     ӈу+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: ӈундиʼ
     ӈу+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: ӈухундиʼ
     ӈу+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: ӈухунандиʼ
     ӈу+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: ӈухудандиʼ
     ӈу+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: ӈувнандиʼ
     ӈу+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: ӈухуюдиʼ
     ӈу+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: ӈухуюдиʼ
     ӈу+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: ӈухуютиʼ
     ӈу+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: ӈудиʼ
     ӈу+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: ӈудиʼ
     ӈу+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: ӈутиʼ
     ӈу+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: ӈухутиʼ
     ӈу+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: ӈухуˮнатиʼ
     ӈу+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: ӈухутатиʼ
     ӈу+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: ӈуˮумнатиʼ
     ӈу+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: ӈудиʼ
     ӈу+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: ӈумдиʼ
     ӈу+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: ӈундиʼ
     ӈу+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: ӈухундиʼ
     ӈу+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: ӈухунандиʼ
     ӈу+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: ӈухудандиʼ
     ӈу+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: ӈувнандиʼ
     ӈу+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: ӈухуюдиʼ
     ӈу+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: ӈухуюдиʼ
     ӈу+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: ӈухуютиʼ
     ӈу+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: ӈудиʼ
     ӈу+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: ӈудиʼ
     ӈу+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: ӈутиʼ
     ӈу+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: ӈухутиʼ
     ӈу+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: ӈухуˮнатиʼ
     ӈу+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: ӈухутатиʼ
     ӈу+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: ӈуˮумнатиʼ
     ӈу+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: ӈуваˮ
     ӈу+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: ӈуваˮ
     ӈу+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: ӈунаˮ
     ӈу+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: ӈухунаˮ
     ӈу+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: ӈухунанаˮ
     ӈу+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: ӈухуданаˮ
     ӈу+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: ӈувнанаˮ
     ӈу+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: ӈухуюнаˮ
     ӈу+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: ӈухуюнаˮ
     ӈу+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: ӈухуюнаˮ
     ӈу+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: ӈунаˮ
     ӈу+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: ӈунаˮ
     ӈу+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: ӈуˮнаˮ
     ӈу+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: ӈухуˮнаˮ
     ӈу+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: ӈухуˮнанаˮ
     ӈу+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: ӈухутанаˮ
     ӈу+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: ӈуˮумнанаˮ
     ӈу+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: ӈураˮ
     ӈу+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: ӈумдаˮ
     ӈу+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: ӈундаˮ
     ӈу+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: ӈухундаˮ
     ӈу+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: ӈухунандаˮ
     ӈу+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: ӈухудандаˮ
     ӈу+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: ӈувнандаˮ
     ӈу+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: ӈухуюдаˮ
     ӈу+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: ӈухуюдаˮ
     ӈу+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: ӈухуютаˮ
     ӈу+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: ӈудаˮ
     ӈу+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: ӈудаˮ
     ӈу+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: ӈутаˮ
     ӈу+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: ӈухутаˮ
     ӈу+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: ӈухуˮнатаˮ
     ӈу+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: ӈухутатаˮ
     ӈу+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: ӈуˮумнатаˮ
     ӈу+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: ӈудоʼ
     ӈу+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: ӈумдоʼ
     ӈу+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: ӈундоʼ
     ӈу+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: ӈухундоʼ
     ӈу+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: ӈухунандоʼ
     ӈу+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: ӈухудандоʼ
     ӈу+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: ӈувнандоʼ
     ӈу+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: ӈухуюдоʼ
     ӈу+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: ӈухуюдоʼ
     ӈу+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: ӈухуютоʼ
     ӈу+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: ӈудоʼ
     ӈу+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: ӈудоʼ
     ӈу+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: ӈутоʼ
     ӈу+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: ӈухутоʼ
     ӈу+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: ӈухуˮнатоʼ
     ӈу+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: ӈухутатоʼ
     ӈу+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: ӈуˮумнатоʼ
     ӈу+N+Pred+Abs: ӈуд
     ӈу+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [ӈудав, ӈудув]
     ӈу+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [ӈудав, ӈудув]
     ӈу+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: ӈудан
     ӈу+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: ӈудар
     ӈу+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: ӈудамд
     ӈу+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: ӈуданд
     ӈу+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: [ӈудада, ӈудда]
     ӈу+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: ӈудамда
     ӈу+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: ӈуданда
     ӈу+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: [ӈудамиʼ, ӈудмиʼ]
#     ӈу+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1.2: [ӈудами, ӈудми]
     ӈу+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: [ӈудамиʼ, ӈудмиʼ]
#     ӈу+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1.2: [ӈудами, ӈудми]
     ӈу+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: [ӈуданиʼ, ӈудниʼ]
#     ӈу+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1.2: [ӈудани, ӈудни]
     ӈу+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: [ӈудариʼ, ӈудриʼ]
     ӈу+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: ӈудамдиʼ
     ӈу+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: ӈудандиʼ
     ӈу+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: [ӈудадиʼ, ӈуддиʼ]
     ӈу+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: ӈудамдиʼ
     ӈу+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: ӈудандиʼ
     ӈу+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: [ӈудаваˮ, ӈудваˮ]
     ӈу+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: [ӈудаваˮ, ӈудваˮ]
     ӈу+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: [ӈуданаˮ, ӈуднаˮ]
     ӈу+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: [ӈудараˮ, ӈудраˮ]
     ӈу+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: ӈудамдаˮ
     ӈу+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: ӈудандаˮ
     ӈу+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: [ӈудадоʼ, ӈуддоʼ]
     ӈу+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: ӈудамдоʼ
     ӈу+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: ӈудандоʼ
     ӈу+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: ӈудмʼ
     ӈу+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: ӈун
     ӈу+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈу
     ӈу+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: ӈуниʼ
     ӈу+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: ӈудиʼ
     ӈу+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈухуʼ
     ӈу+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: ӈуваˮ
     ӈу+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: ӈудаˮ
     ӈу+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈуˮ
     ӈу+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: ӈудамзь
     ӈу+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: ӈунась
     ӈу+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈусь
     ӈу+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: ӈунинзь
     ӈу+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: ӈудинзь
     ӈу+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈухунзь
     ӈу+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: ӈуваць
     ӈу+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: ӈудаць
     ӈу+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈуць
     ӈу+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈув
     ӈу+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈур
     ӈу+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈуда
     ӈу+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈумиʼ
     ӈу+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈуриʼ
     ӈу+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈудиʼ
     ӈу+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈуваˮ
     ӈу+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈураˮ
     ӈу+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈудоʼ
     ӈу+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈувась
     ӈу+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈурась
     ӈу+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈудась
     ӈу+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈуминзь
     ӈу+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈуринзь
     ӈу+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈудинзь
     ӈу+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈуваць
     ӈу+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈураць
     ӈу+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈудонзь
     ӈу+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈухуюн
     ӈу+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈухуюд
     ӈу+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈухуюда
     ӈу+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈухуюниʼ
     ӈу+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈухуюдиʼ
     ӈу+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈухуюдиʼ
     ӈу+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈухуюнаˮ
     ӈу+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈухуюдаˮ
     ӈу+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈухуюдоʼ
     ӈу+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈухуюнась
     ӈу+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈухуюдась
     ӈу+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈухуюдась
     ӈу+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈухуюнинзь
     ӈу+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈухуюдинзь
     ӈу+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈухуюдинзь
     ӈу+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈухуюнаць
     ӈу+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈухуюдаць
     ӈу+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈухуюдонзь
     ӈу+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈун
     ӈу+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈуд
     ӈу+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈуда
     ӈу+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈуниʼ
     ӈу+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈудиʼ
     ӈу+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈудиʼ
     ӈу+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈунаˮ
     ӈу+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈудаˮ
     ӈу+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈудоʼ
     ӈу+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈунась
     ӈу+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈудась
     ӈу+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈудась
     ӈу+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈунинзь
     ӈу+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈудинзь
     ӈу+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈудинзь
     ӈу+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈунаць
     ӈу+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈудаць
     ӈу+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈудонзь
     ӈу+N+Tra: ӈуӈэ
     ӈу+N+Car: ӈусиˮ
     ӈу+N+Equ: ӈудремʼ
     ӈу+N+Equ+Lat: ӈудревʼ
